src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/V2-Oct_2016_gt-desc.yaml
     võitlema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: võitlesid
     võitlema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: võitlesin
     võitlema+V+Inf: võidelda
     võitlema+V+Ger: võideldes
     võitlema+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: võideldud
     võitlema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: võideldud
     võitlema+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: võidelduks
     võitlema+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: võideldav
     võitlema+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: võideldavat
     võitlema+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: võideldaks
     võitlema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: võidelda
     võitlema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: võideldakse
     võitlema+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: võideldagu
     võitlema+V+Impers+Sup: võideldama
     võitlema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: võideldi
     võitlema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: võidelgu
     võitlema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: võidelge
     võitlema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: võidelgem
     võitlema+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: võidelnuvat
     võitlema+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: võidelnud
     võitlema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: võidelnud
     võitlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: võidelnuks
     võitlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: võidelnuksid
     võitlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: võidelnuksite
     võitlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: võidelnuksime
     võitlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: võidelnuksid
     võitlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: võidelnuksin
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: võrdlema
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: võrdlemast
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: võrdlemas
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: võrdlemaks
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: võrdlemata
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prs+Prc: võrdlev
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prs+Quot: võrdlevat
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: võrdled
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: võrdleks
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: võrdleksid
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: võrdleksite
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: võrdleksime
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: võrdleksid
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: võrdleksin
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: võrdlen
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: võrdleme
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: võrdlete
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: võrdlevad
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: võrdleb
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: võrdle
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: võrdle
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: võrdles
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: võrdlesid
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: võrdlesite
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: võrdlesime
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: võrdlesid
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: võrdlesin
     võrdlema+V+Inf: võrrelda
     võrdlema+V+Ger: võrreldes
     võrdlema+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: võrreldud
     võrdlema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: võrreldud
     võrdlema+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: võrrelduks
     võrdlema+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: võrreldav
     võrdlema+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: võrreldavat
     võrdlema+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: võrreldaks
     võrdlema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: võrrelda
     võrdlema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: võrreldakse
     võrdlema+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: võrreldagu
     võrdlema+V+Impers+Sup: võrreldama
     võrdlema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: võrreldi
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: võrrelgu
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: võrrelge
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: võrrelgem
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: võrrelnuvat
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: võrrelnud
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: võrrelnud
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: võrrelnuks
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: võrrelnuksid
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: võrrelnuksite
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: võrrelnuksime
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: võrrelnuksid
     võrdlema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: võrrelnuksin
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: vähkrema
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: vähkremast
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: vähkremas
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: vähkremaks
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: vähkremata
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prs+Prc: vähkrev
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prs+Quot: vähkrevat
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: vähkred
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: vähkreks
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: vähkreksid
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: vähkreksite
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: vähkreksime
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: vähkreksid
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: vähkreksin
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: vähkren
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: vähkreme
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: vähkrete
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: vähkrevad
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: vähkreb
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: vähkre
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: vähkre
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: vähkres
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: vähkresid
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: vähkresite
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: vähkresime
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: vähkresid
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: vähkresin
     vähkrema+V+Inf: väherda
     vähkrema+V+Ger: väherdes
     vähkrema+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: väherdud
     vähkrema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: väherdud
     vähkrema+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: väherduks
     vähkrema+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: väherdav
     vähkrema+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: väherdavat
     vähkrema+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: väherdaks
     vähkrema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: väherda
     vähkrema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: väherdakse
     vähkrema+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: väherdagu
     vähkrema+V+Impers+Sup: väherdama
     vähkrema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: väherdi
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: vähergu
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: väherge
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: vähergem
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: vähernuvat
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: vähernud
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: vähernud
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: vähernuks
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: vähernuksid
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: vähernuksite
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: vähernuksime
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: vähernuksid
     vähkrema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: vähernuksin
     jooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: jõid
     jooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: jõite
     jooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: jõime
     jooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: jõid
     jooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: jõin
     jooma+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: jõi
     jahtima+V+Inf: jahtida
     jahtima+V+Ger: jahtides
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: jahtis
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: jahtisid
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: jahtisite
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: jahtisime
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: jahtisid
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: jahtisin
     jahtima+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: jahtima
     jahtima+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: jahtimast
     jahtima+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: jahtimas
     jahtima+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: jahtimaks
     jahtima+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: jahtimata
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prs+Prc: jahtiv
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prs+Quot: jahtivat
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: jahtinuvat
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: jahtinud
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: jahtinud
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: jahtinuks
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: jahtinuksid
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: jahtinuksite
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: jahtinuksime
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: jahtinuksid
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: jahtinuksin
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: jahtigu
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: jahtige
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: jahtigem
     jahtima+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: jahitud
     jahtima+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: jahitud
     jahtima+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: jahituks
     jahtima+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: jahitav
     jahtima+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: jahitavat
     jahtima+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: jahitaks
     jahtima+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: jahita
     jahtima+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: jahitakse
     jahtima+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: jahitagu
     jahtima+V+Impers+Sup: jahitama
     jahtima+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: jahiti
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: jahid
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: jahiks
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: jahiksid
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: jahiksite
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: jahiksime
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: jahiksid
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: jahiksin
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: jahin
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: jahime
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: jahite
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: jahivad
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: jahib
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: jahi
     jahtima+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: jahi
     julgema+V+Inf: julgeda
     julgema+V+Ger: julgedes
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg3+Aff: julges
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl3+Aff: julgesid
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl2+Aff: julgesite
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Pl1+Aff: julgesime
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg2+Aff: julgesid
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Sg1+Aff: julgesin
     julgema+V+Pers+Sup+Ill: julgema
     julgema+V+Pers+Sup+Ela: julgemast
     julgema+V+Pers+Sup+Ine: julgemas
     julgema+V+Pers+Sup+Tra: julgemaks
     julgema+V+Pers+Sup+Abe: julgemata
     julgema+V+Pers+Prs+Prc: julgev
     julgema+V+Pers+Prs+Quot: julgevat
     julgema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg2+Aff: julged
     julgema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond: julgeks
     julgema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl3+Aff: julgeksid
     julgema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl2+Aff: julgeksite
     julgema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Pl1+Aff: julgeksime
     julgema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg2+Aff: julgeksid
     julgema+V+Pers+Prs+Cond+Sg1+Aff: julgeksin
     julgema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg1+Aff: julgen
     julgema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl1+Aff: julgeme
     julgema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl2+Aff: julgete
     julgema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Pl3+Aff: julgevad
     julgema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Sg3+Aff: julgeb
     julgema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Sg2: julge
     julgema+V+Pers+Prs+Ind+Neg: julge
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Quot: julgenuvat
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Prc: julgenud
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg: julgenud
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond: julgenuks
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff: julgenuksid
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff: julgenuksite
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff: julgenuksime
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff: julgenuksid
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff: julgenuksin
     julgema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt: julgegu
     julgema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl2: julgege
     julgema+V+Pers+Prs+Imprt+Pl1: julgegem
     julgema+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: julgetud
     julgema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: julgetud
     julgema+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: julgetuks
     julgema+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: julgetav
     julgema+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: julgetavat
     julgema+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: julgetaks
     julgema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: julgeta
     julgema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff: julgetakse
     julgema+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: julgetagu
     julgema+V+Impers+Sup: julgetama
     julgema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: julgeti
     julgema+V+Impers+Prt+Prc+Usage/Rare: juletud
     julgema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg+Usage/Rare: juletud
     julgema+V+Impers+Prt+Cond+Usage/Rare: juletuks
     julgema+V+Impers+Prs+Prc+Usage/Rare: juletav
     julgema+V+Impers+Prs+Quot+Usage/Rare: juletavat
     julgema+V+Impers+Prs+Cond+Usage/Rare: juletaks
     julgema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg+Usage/Rare: juleta
     julgema+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Aff+Usage/Rare: juletakse
     julgema+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt+Usage/Rare: juletagu
     julgema+V+Impers+Sup+Usage/Rare: juletama
     julgema+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff+Usage/Rare: juleti
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Quot+Usage/Rare: julenuvat
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Prc+Usage/Rare: julenud
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Ind+Neg+Usage/Rare: julenud
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Usage/Rare: julenuks
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl3+Aff+Usage/Rare: julenuksid
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl2+Aff+Usage/Rare: julenuksite
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Pl1+Aff+Usage/Rare: julenuksime
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg2+Aff+Usage/Rare: julenuksid
     julgema+V+Pers+Prt+Cond+Sg1+Aff+Usage/Rare: julenuksin
     jooma+V+Impers+Prt+Prc: joodud
     jooma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Neg: joodud
     jooma+V+Impers+Prt+Cond: jooduks
     jooma+V+Impers+Prs+Prc: joodav
     jooma+V+Impers+Prs+Quot: joodavat
     jooma+V+Impers+Prs+Cond: joodaks
     jooma+V+Impers+Prs+Ind+Neg: jooda
     jooma+V+Impers+Prs+Imprt: joodagu
     jooma+V+Impers+Sup: joodama
     jooma+V+Impers+Prt+Ind+Aff: joodi
